Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.070

Warrants for incidental expenses—Payment of.

Upon presentation of a warrant, drawn as provided for in RCW 44.04.060, to the state treasurer, that officer shall pay the same out of any money in the treasury of the state appropriated for the expenses of the legislature of the state of Washington: PROVIDED, That should there be no money in the state treasury covered by such appropriation, the state treasurer shall indorse such fact on the warrant presented, and said warrant shall draw interest from the date of such presentation and indorsement, and shall be payable thereafter in the manner provided by existing law and custom.

[ 1890 p 10 s 2; RRS s 8153. FORMER PARTS OF SECTION: (i) 1890 p 3 s 2, now codified as RCW 44.04.051. (ii) 1890 p 6 s 2, now codified as RCW 44.04.041.]